pl: Gatunek ponadgabarytowy lub podgabarytowy: Nadwymiar 0,10 mm (0,004 cala); Nadwymiar 0,20 mm (0,008 cala); Nadwymiar 0,25 mm (0,010 cala); Podwymiar 0,25 mm (0,010 cala); Nadwymiar 0,50 mm (0,020 cala); Podwymiar 0,50 mm (0,020 cala); Nadwymiar 0,75 mm (0,030 cala); Podwymiar 0,75 mm (0,030 cala); Nadwymiar 1,00 mm (0,040 cala); Podwymiar 1,00 mm (0,040 cala); Różne rozmiary (patrz uwagi); Standardowy (STD); Inne
tr: Büyük veya küçük beden sınıfı: 0,10 mm Üzeri (0,004 inç); 0,20 mm Üzeri (0,008 inç); 0,25 mm Üzeri (0,010 inç); 0,25 mm Altı (0,010 inç); 0,50 mm Üzeri (0,020 inç); 0,50 mm Altı (0,020 inç); 0,75 mm Üzeri (0,030 inç); 0,75 mm Altı (0,030 inç); 1,00 mm üstü (0,040 inç); 1,00 mm altı (0,040 inç); Karışık boyutlar (notlara bakın); Standart (STD); Diğer
ja: 特大または小さめの等級: 0.10 mm オーバー (0.004 インチ); 0.20 mm オーバー (0.008 インチ); 0.25 mm オーバー (0.010 インチ); 0.25 mm アンダー (0.010 インチ); 0.50 mm オーバー (0.020 インチ); 0.50 mm アンダー (0.020 インチ); 0.75 mm オーバー (0.030 インチ); 0.75 mm アンダー (0.030 インチ); 1.00 mm オーバー (0.040 インチ); 1.00 mm アンダー (0.040 インチ); 混合サイズ (注記を参照); スタンダード (STD); その他
zh-CN: 加大或缩小尺寸等级: 增大 0.10 毫米（0.004 英寸）; 增大 0.20 毫米（0.008 英寸）; 增大 0.25 毫米（0.010 英寸）; 减小 0.25 毫米（0.010 英寸）; 增大 0.50 毫米（0.020 英寸）; 减小 0.50 毫米（0.020 英寸）; 增大 0.75 毫米（0.030 英寸）; 减小 0.75 毫米（0.030 英寸）; 增大 1.00 毫米（0.040 英寸）; 减小 1.00 毫米（0.040 英寸）; 混合尺寸（见注释）; 标准 (STD); 其他
hr-HR: Predimenzionirani ili premali razred: 0,10 mm iznad (0,004 in); 0,20 mm iznad (0,008 in); 0,25 mm iznad (0,010 in); 0,25 mm ispod (0,010 in); 0,50 mm iznad (0,020 in); 0,50 mm ispod (0,020 in); 0,75 mm iznad (0,030 in); 0,75 mm ispod (0,030 in); 1,00 mm iznad (0,040 in); 1,00 mm ispod (0,040 in); Miješane veličine (pogledajte napomene); Standardno (STD); Ostalo
sk-SK: Stupeň nadrozmernej alebo podrozmernej veľkosti: +0,10 mm (0,004 palca); +0,20 mm (0,008 palca); +0,25 mm (0,010 palca); -0,25 mm (0,010 palca); +0,50 mm (0,020 palca); -0,50 mm (0,020 palca); +0,75 mm (0,030 palca); -0,75 mm (0,030 palca); +1,00 mm (0,040 palca); -1,00 mm (0,040 palca); Rôzne veľkosti (pozrite poznámky); Štandardné (STD); Iné
it: Grado sovradimensionato o sottodimensionato: Maggiorazione 0,10 mm (0,004 in); Maggiorazione 0,20 mm (0,008 in); Maggiorazione 0,25 mm (0,010 in); Minorazione 0,25 mm (0,010 in); Maggiorazione 0,50 mm (0,020 in); Minorazione 0,50 mm (0,020 in); Maggiorazione 0,75 mm (0,030 in); Minorazione 0,75 mm (0,030 in); Maggiorazione 1,00 mm (0,040 in); Minorazione 1,00 mm (0,040 in); Misure miste (vedi note); Standard (STD); Altro
fi: Ylikoko- tai alikokoluokka: 0,10 mm yli (0,004 tuumaa); 0,20 mm yli (0,008 tuumaa); 0,25 mm yli (0,010 tuumaa); 0,25 mm alle (0,010 tuumaa); 0,50 mm yli (0,020 tuumaa); 0,50 mm alle (0,020 tuumaa); 0,75 mm yli (0,030 tuumaa); 0,75 mm alle (0,030 tuumaa); 1,00 mm yli (0,040 tuumaa); 1,00 mm alle (0,040 tuumaa); Sekakoot (katso huomautukset); Vakio (STD); Muu
pt-PT: Grau de tamanho grande ou pequeno: Mais 0,10 mm (0,004 pol.); Mais 0,20 mm (0,008 pol.); Mais 0,25 mm (0,010 pol.); Menos 0,25 mm (0,010 pol.); Mais 0,50 mm (0,020 pol.); Menos 0,50 mm (0,020 pol.); Mais 0,75 mm (0,030 pol.); Menos 0,75 mm (0,030 pol.); Mais 1,00 mm (0,040 pol.); Menos 1,00 mm (0,040 pol.); Tamanhos mistos (ver notas); Padrão (STD); Outro
da: Overdimensioneret eller underdimensioneret: 0,10 mm overdimension (0,004"); 0,20 mm overdimension (0,008"); 0,25 mm overdimension (0,010"); 0,25 mm underdimension (0,010"); 0,50 mm overdimension (0,020"); 0,50 mm underdimension (0,020"); 0,75 mm overdimension (0,030"); 0,75 mm underdimension (0,030"); 1,00 mm overdimension (0,040"); 1,00 mm underdimension (0,040"); Blandede størrelser (se bemærkninger); Standard (STD); Andet
lt-LT: Padidinto arba sumažinto dydžio klasė: 0,10 mm didesnis (0,004 col.); 0,20 mm didesnis (0,008 col.); 0,25 mm didesnis (0,010 col.); 0,25 mm mažesnis (0,010 col.); 0,50 mm didesnis (0,020 col.); 0,50 mm mažesnis (0,020 col.); 0,75 mm didesnis (0,030 col.); 0,75 mm mažesnis (0,030 col.); 1,00 mm didesnis (0,040 col.); 1,00 mm mažesnis (0,040 col.); Skirtingi dydžiai (žr. pastabas); Standartinis (STD); Kita
de: Übergrößen- oder Untergrößenklasse: 0,10 mm Übermaß (0,004 Zoll); 0,20 mm Übermaß (0,008 Zoll); 0,25 mm Übermaß (0,010 Zoll); 0,25 mm Untermaß (0,010 Zoll); 0,50 mm Übermaß (0,020 Zoll); 0,50 mm Untermaß (0,020 Zoll); 0,75 mm Übermaß (0,030 Zoll); 0,75 mm Untermaß (0,030 Zoll); 1,00 mm Übermaß (0,040 Zoll); 1,00 mm Untermaß (0,040 Zoll); Gemischte Größen (siehe Notizen); Standard (STD); Sonstige
sv: Överdimensionerings- eller underdimensioneringsgrad: 0,10 mm överdimension (0,004 tum); 0,20 mm överdimension (0,008 tum); 0,25 mm överdimension (0,010 tum); 0,25 mm underdimension (0,010 tum); 0,50 mm överdimension (0,020 tum); 0,50 mm underdimension (0,020 tum); 0,75 mm överdimension (0,030 tum); 0,75 mm underdimension (0,030 tum); 1,00 mm överdimension (0,040 tum); 1,00 mm underdimension (0,040 tum); Blandade storlekar (se anteckningar); Standard (STD); Övrigt
vi: Kích thước quá khổ hoặc quá nhỏ: Tăng 0,10 mm (0.004 in); Tăng 0,20 mm (0.008 in); Tăng 0,25 mm (0.010 in); Giảm 0,25 mm (0.010 in); Tăng 0,50 mm (0.020 in); Giảm 0,50 mm (0.020 in); Tăng 0,75 mm (0.030 in); Giảm 0,75 mm (0.030 in); Tăng 1,00 mm (0.040 in); Giảm 1,00 mm (0.040 in); Kích thước hỗn hợp (xem ghi chú); Tiêu chuẩn (STD); Khác
zh-TW: 加大或縮小尺寸等級: 0.10 mm 加大 (0.004 吋); 0.20 mm 加大 (0.008 吋); 0.25 mm 加大 (0.010 吋); 0.25 mm 縮小 (0.010 吋); 0.50 mm 加大 (0.020 吋); 0.50 mm 縮小 (0.020 吋); 0.75 mm 加大 (0.030 吋); 0.75 mm 縮小 (0.030 吋); 1.00 mm 加大 (0.040 吋); 1.00 mm 縮小 (0.040 吋); 混合尺寸 (請見備註); 標準 (STD); 其他
cs: Nadměrný nebo podměrný stupeň: 0,10 mm nadměr (0,004 in); 0,20 mm nadměr (0,008 in); 0,25 mm nadměr (0,010 in); 0,25 mm podměr (0,010 in); 0,50 mm nadměr (0,020 in); 0,50 mm podměr (0,020 in); 0,75 mm nadměr (0,030 in); 0,75 mm podměr (0,030 in); 1,00 mm nadměr (0,040 in); 1,00 mm podměr (0,040 in); Různé velikosti (viz poznámky); Standardní (STD); Ostatní
fr: Grade de taille majorée ou minorée: Surcote de 0,10 mm (0,004 po); Surcote de 0,20 mm (0,008 po); Surcote de 0,25 mm (0,010 po); Sous-cote de 0,25 mm (0,010 po); Surcote de 0,50 mm (0,020 po); Sous-cote de 0,50 mm (0,020 po); Surcote de 0,75 mm (0,030 po); Sous-cote de 0,75 mm (0,030 po); Surcote de 1,00 mm (0,040 po); Sous-cote de 1,00 mm (0,040 po); Tailles mixtes (voir les notes); Standard (STD); Autre
bg-BG: Клас на увеличен или намален размер: 0,10 мм уголемен (0,004 инча); 0,20 мм уголемен (0,008 инча); 0,25 мм уголемен (0,010 инча); 0,25 мм намален (0,010 инча); 0,50 мм уголемен (0,020 инча); 0,50 мм намален (0,020 инча); 0,75 мм уголемен (0,030 инча); 0,75 мм намален (0,030 инча); 1,00 мм уголемен (0,040 инча); 1,00 мм намален (0,040 инча); Различни размери (вижте бележките); Стандартен (STD); Друго
pt-BR: Grau sobremedida ou submedida: 0,10 mm a mais (0,004 pol.); 0,20 mm a mais (0,008 pol.); 0,25 mm a mais (0,010 pol.); 0,25 mm a menos (0,010 pol.); 0,50 mm a mais (0,020 pol.); 0,50 mm a menos (0,020 pol.); 0,75 mm a mais (0,030 pol.); 0,75 mm a menos (0,030 pol.); 1,00 mm a mais (0,040 pol.); 1,00 mm a menos (0,040 pol.); Tamanhos mistos (veja as notas); Padrão (STD); Outros
el: Υπερμεγέθης ή υπομεγέθης βαθμός: Μεγαλύτερο κατά 0,10 mm (0,004 in); Μεγαλύτερο κατά 0,20 mm (0,008 in); Μεγαλύτερο κατά 0,25 mm (0,010 in); Μικρότερο κατά 0,25 mm (0,010 in); Μεγαλύτερο κατά 0,50 mm (0,020 in); Μικρότερο κατά 0,50 mm (0,020 in); Μεγαλύτερο κατά 0,75 mm (0,030 in); Μικρότερο κατά 0,75 mm (0,030 in); Μεγαλύτερο κατά 1,00 mm (0,040 in); Μικρότερο κατά 1,00 mm (0,040 in); Μεικτά μεγέθη (δείτε σημειώσεις); Τυπικό (STD); Άλλο
es: Grado de sobremedida o submedida: 0,10 mm por encima (0,004 in); 0,20 mm por encima (0,008 in); 0,25 mm por encima (0,010 in); 0,25 mm por debajo (0,010 in); 0,50 mm por encima (0,020 in); 0,50 mm por debajo (0,020 in); 0,75 mm por encima (0,030 in); 0,75 mm por debajo (0,030 in); 1,00 mm por encima (0,040 in); 1,00 mm por debajo (0,040 in); Tamaños mixtos (ver notas); Estándar (STD); Otro
ko: 오버사이즈 또는 언더사이즈 등급: 0.10mm 오버(0.004인치); 0.20mm 오버(0.008인치); 0.25mm 오버(0.010인치); 0.25mm 언더(0.010인치); 0.50mm 오버(0.020인치); 0.50mm 언더(0.020인치); 0.75mm 오버(0.030인치); 0.75mm 언더(0.030인치); 1.00mm 오버(0.040인치); 1.00mm 언더(0.040인치); 혼합 사이즈(참고 사항 참조); 표준(STD); 기타
ru: Размерная категория больше или меньше номинального: +0,10 мм (0,004 дюйма); +0,20 мм (0,008 дюйма); +0,25 мм (0,010 дюйма); -0,25 мм (0,010 дюйма); +0,50 мм (0,020 дюйма); -0,50 мм (0,020 дюйма); +0,75 мм (0,030 дюйма); -0,75 мм (0,030 дюйма); +1,00 мм (0,040 дюйма); -1,00 мм (0,040 дюйма); Смешанные размеры (см. примечания); Стандартный (STD); Другое
nb: Overdimensjonert eller underdimensjonert klasse: 0,10 mm over (0,004 tommer); 0,20 mm over (0,008 tommer); 0,25 mm over (0,010 tommer); 0,25 mm under (0,010 tommer); 0,50 mm over (0,020 tommer); 0,50 mm under (0,020 tommer); 0,75 mm over (0,030 tommer); 0,75 mm under (0,030 tommer); 1,00 mm over (0,040 tommer); 1,00 mm under (0,040 tommer); Blandede størrelser (se notater); Standard (STD); Annet
hu: Túlméretes vagy alulméretes osztály: 0,10 mm túlméret (0,004 in); 0,20 mm túlméret (0,008 in); 0,25 mm túlméret (0,010 in); 0,25 mm alulméret (0,010 in); 0,50 mm túlméret (0,020 in); 0,50 mm alulméret (0,020 in); 0,75 mm túlméret (0,030 in); 0,75 mm alulméret (0,030 in); 1,00 mm túlméret (0,040 in); 1,00 mm alulméret (0,040 in); Vegyes méretek (lásd a megjegyzéseket); Standard (STD); Egyéb
ro-RO: Grad de supradimensionare sau subdimensionare: 0,10 mm peste (0,004 in); 0,20 mm peste (0,008 in); 0,25 mm peste (0,010 in); 0,25 mm sub (0,010 in); 0,50 mm peste (0,020 in); 0,50 mm sub (0,020 in); 0,75 mm peste (0,030 in); 0,75 mm sub (0,030 in); 1,00 mm peste (0,040 in); 1,00 mm sub (0,040 in); Dimensiuni mixte (vezi notele); Standard (STD); Altele
en: Oversize or undersize grade: 0.10 mm Over (0.004 in); 0.20 mm Over (0.008 in); 0.25 mm Over (0.010 in); 0.25 mm Under (0.010 in); 0.50 mm Over (0.020 in); 0.50 mm Under (0.020 in); 0.75 mm Over (0.030 in); 0.75 mm Under (0.030 in); 1.00 mm Over (0.040 in); 1.00 mm Under (0.040 in); Mixed sizes (see notes); Standard (STD); Other
nl: Overmaat- of ondermaatklasse: 0,10 mm overmaat (0,004 in); 0,20 mm overmaat (0,008 in); 0,25 mm overmaat (0,010 in); 0,25 mm ondermaat (0,010 in); 0,50 mm overmaat (0,020 in); 0,50 mm ondermaat (0,020 in); 0,75 mm overmaat (0,030 in); 0,75 mm ondermaat (0,030 in); 1,00 mm overmaat (0,040 in); 1,00 mm ondermaat (0,040 in); Gemengde maten (zie opmerkingen); Standaard (STD); Overige
sl-SI: Stopnja prevelike ali premajhne velikosti (prevelikih/premajhnih delov): 0,10 mm nad (0,004 in); 0,20 mm nad (0,008 in); 0,25 mm nad (0,010 in); 0,25 mm pod (0,010 in); 0,50 mm nad (0,020 in); 0,50 mm pod (0,020 in); 0,75 mm nad (0,030 in); 0,75 mm pod (0,030 in); 1,00 mm nad (0,040 in); 1,00 mm pod (0,040 in); Različne velikosti (glejte opombe); Standard (STD); Drugo
th: เกรดขนาดใหญ่เกินไปหรือเล็กเกินไป: โอเวอร์ 0.10 มม. (0.004 นิ้ว); โอเวอร์ 0.20 มม. (0.008 นิ้ว); โอเวอร์ 0.25 มม. (0.010 นิ้ว); อันเดอร์ 0.25 มม. (0.010 นิ้ว); โอเวอร์ 0.50 มม. (0.020 นิ้ว); อันเดอร์ 0.50 มม. (0.020 นิ้ว); โอเวอร์ 0.75 มม. (0.030 นิ้ว); อันเดอร์ 0.75 มม. (0.030 นิ้ว); โอเวอร์ 1.00 มม. (0.040 นิ้ว); อันเดอร์ 1.00 มม. (0.040 นิ้ว); ขนาดผสม (ดูหมายเหตุ); มาตรฐาน (STD); อื่นๆ